Alaska statutes. Title 16. Fish and Game.
Article 4. Utilization of Pollock and Herring.

Sec. 16.10.164.
Policy on utilization of pollock.

The legislature declares that stripping roe from pollock without utilizing the flesh is wasteful and does not constitute utilization of this resource for the maximum benefit of the people.
Therefore, it is the policy of the state that

roe stripping be eliminated to the fullest extent possible; and

pollock taken in a commercial fishery should be utilized for human consumption to the fullest extent practicable.

History.

(§ 2 ch 116 SLA 1990)

Cross references. —

For legislative findings in connection with the enactment of this section and AS

16.10.165

, see § 1, ch. 116, SLA 1990 in the Temporary and Special Acts.

Sec. 16.10.165.
Utilization of groundfish taken in a commercial fishery.

Unless otherwise provided by law, a person may not recklessly waste or cause to be wasted groundfish taken in a commercial fishery.

The Board of Fisheries may adopt regulations under AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act) it considers necessary for implementation of this section. The board may delegate its authority under this section to the commissioner.

A person who violates this section is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.

Each day on which a violation of this section occurs is a separate violation.

In this section

“flesh” means all muscular body tissue surrounding the skeleton;

“groundfish” means

pollock; or

other species of groundfish designated by the Board of Fisheries under authority of this section;

“person” includes a joint venture;

“waste” means the failure to use the flesh of groundfish for human consumption, reduction to meal, production of food for domestic animals or fish, bait, or scientific, display, or educational purposes; “waste” does not include normal, inadvertent loss of flesh associated with processing that cannot be prevented by practical means.

History.

(§ 2 ch 116 SLA 1990; am §§ 1 — 3 ch 19 SLA 1998)

Revisor’s notes. —

Paragraph (e)(2) was enacted as (e)(4). Renumbered in 1998, at which time former (e)(2) and (3) were renumbered as (e)(3) and (4), respectively.

Cross references. —

For penalties for class A misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.035(b)(5)

and

12.55.135(a)

.

Sec. 16.10.172.
Legislative policy on utilization of herring.

The legislature finds the following: (1) extensive and valuable herring populations are available for harvest in waters subject to the jurisdiction of the state; (2) commercial markets are available for herring processed in several forms; (3) one processing technique presently employed involves deliberately permitting decomposition of the herring carcass to allow for removal and subsequent sale of the roe product, with the consequence that the flesh is unusable and discarded.
The legislature declares that the process referred to in (3) of this section is wasteful and does not constitute utilization of this resource for the maximum benefit of the people. Therefore, it is the policy of the legislature that this process should be eliminated to the fullest extent possible.

History.

(§ 1 ch 9 SLA 1977)

Sec. 16.10.173.
Utilization of commercially taken herring.

A person may not waste or cause to be wasted any commercially taken herring.

The Board of Fisheries may adopt regulations under AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act) it considers necessary for implementation of this section. The board may delegate its authority under this section to the commissioner.

The provisions of this section do not apply to herring taken commercially in the Bering Sea (including appurtenant bays, sounds, estuaries, and water of the state) north of 56° North Latitude, until January 1, 1979.

In this section,

“flesh” means all muscular body tissue surrounding the bony skeleton of the herring;

“person” has the meaning given in AS

01.10.060

and also includes a joint venture;

“waste” means the failure to use the flesh of commercially taken herring for reduction to meal, production of fish food, human consumption, food for domestic animals, scientific or educational purposes, or round herring bait. Normal, inadvertent loss of flesh associated with the uses described in this subsection that cannot be prevented by practical means does not constitute waste. The commissioner may authorize other uses of commercially taken herring consistent with the intent of this section and AS

16.10.172

upon receipt of a request accompanied by a detailed justification.

A person who violates this section is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.

History.

(§ 1 ch 9 SLA 1977; am § 26 ch 132 SLA 1984)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1992, this section was reorganized as follows: former subsections (d) and (e) were relettered as (b) and (c), respectively; the former last sentence of (a) and the provisions of former (b) and (c) were relocated to (d)(1)-(3), at which time related minor word and punctuation changes were made; and former (f) was relettered as (e).

Cross references. —

For penalties for class A misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.035(b)(5)

and

12.55.135(a)

.

Sec. 16.10.175.
Removal of herring from state.

A person may not remove herring from the state before the herring has been frozen or otherwise processed for shipment.

In this section, “processed for shipment” includes, but is not limited to, icing, stripping, or salting of the herring; however, it does not include salting of the herring if five percent or more of the body weight of the herring consists of roe.

History.

(§ 3 ch 27 SLA 1980)